Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.040

Exemptions—Exceptions—Limitation.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to pertain in any manner to the practice of any regularly qualified oculist or physician, who is regularly licensed to practice medicine in the state of Washington, or to any person who is regularly licensed to practice as a dispensing optician in the state of Washington, nor to any person who in the regular course of trade, sells or offers for sale, spectacles or eyeglasses as regular merchandise without pretense of adapting them to the eyes of the purchaser, and not in evasion of this chapter: PROVIDED, That any such regularly qualified oculist or physician or other person shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 18.53.140 (9) through (14), in connection with the performance of any function coming within the definition of the practice of optometry as defined in this chapter: PROVIDED FURTHER, HOWEVER, That in no way shall this section be construed to permit a dispensing optician to practice optometry as defined in chapter 69, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.

[ 2000 c 171 s 19; 1975 1st ex.s. c 69 s 15; 1937 c 155 s 3; 1919 c 144 s 15; Rem. Supp. 1937 s 10159. Prior: 1909 c 235 s 13.]